Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-76-101. Notice to applicants and holders of licenses, certifications, and registrations — Website links to statutes, rules, policies and guidelines — Electronic notices.

Each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each applicant for a license, certification or registration from the board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, policies and guidelines setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, policies and guidelines.

Each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration from the board, commission, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a license, certification or registration from the entity.

Each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall allow each holder of a license, certification or registration from the board, commission, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

Each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 1998, ch. 1088, § 1; 2008, ch. 1070, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 952, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-76-102. Members of licensing bodies to be citizens of Tennessee.

All members of any board, commission or council that licenses, certifies or regulates any profession or occupation shall, during the time of their respective appointments, be citizens of this state. The appointment of any member of any board, commission or council that licenses or certifies any profession or occupation shall terminate when Tennessee is no longer the domicile of the member.

Acts 1998, ch. 1088, § 3.

62-76-103. Freedom to Prosper Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Freedom to Prosper Act.”

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after July 1, 2017, no political subdivision may:

Impose a licensing requirement on an individual's profession, trade, or occupation if the profession, trade, or occupation is subject to state licensing requirements unless the political subdivision imposed the licensing requirement prior to July 1, 2017; or

Expand or increase any licensing requirement on an individual's profession, trade, or occupation if the licensing requirement existed prior to July 1, 2017, and the profession, trade, or occupation is subject to state licensing requirements.

The prohibitions set out in subsection (b) do not apply to licensing requirements on or any other regulation of law enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical service providers, emergency rescue management providers, or any other type of first responder or emergency service provider.

Acts 2017, ch. 332, § 1.

62-76-104. Denial of license for prior criminal prosecution prohibited.

As used in this section, “licensing authority” means any state department, board, commission, or agency that issues any license, certificate, or registration for an individual to engage in an occupation, profession, business, or trade in this state, including to those licensing authorities that have statutory authority to deny, suspend, or revoke a license for felonies or misdemeanors of moral turpitude.

Subject to the exemptions in this section and unless prohibited by federal law, a licensing authority shall not deny an application for a license, certificate, or registration, or refuse to renew a license, certificate, or registration due to a prior criminal conviction that does not directly relate to the applicable occupation, profession, business, or trade.

Prior to denying an application for a license, certificate, or registration on the basis of a criminal conviction, or prior to the refusal to renew a license, certificate, or registration, on the basis of a criminal conviction, the licensing authority shall notify the applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant of the licensing authority's determination in writing via certified mail, facsimile transmission, or email. The written notification shall include the licensing authority's justification for denial or refusal to renew in accordance to subdivision (b)(4)(A). The determination must state the earliest date upon which the applicant is eligible to reapply for the license, certificate, or registration.

Prior to submitting the application necessary to obtain a license, certificate, or registration, an individual may request written notice from the licensing authority from which they seek to obtain a license, certification, or registration concerning the individual's qualification to obtain the license, certification, or registration based on the individual's criminal history. If the licensing authority determines that an individual is disqualified due to the individual's criminal history, the licensing authority must provide the individual with a written notification that sets forth the reasons for its determination and its justification in accordance with subdivision (b)(4)(A). The written notice as to the individual's qualifications to obtain a license, certification, or registration must be limited to the individual's criminal history and should not be construed as prohibiting the licensing authority from denying an application on other grounds. This determination shall apply exclusively to the individual and shall not be construed as an advisory or formal opinion of the licensing authority.

In considering whether to deny an application for a license, certificate, or registration to an applicant, or whether to refuse to renew a license, certificate, or registration, on the basis of a criminal conviction, the licensing authority must consider:

The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the individual was convicted;

The length of time since the commission of the crime;

The relationship between the nature of the crime and the purposes of regulating the occupation, profession, business, or trade for which the license, certificate, or registration is sought;

The relationship between the crime and the ability, capacity, and fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the occupation, profession, business, or trade;

Any evidence of rehabilitation or treatment undertaken by the individual that might mitigate against the relationship of crime to the occupation, profession, business, or trade; and

Any applicable federal laws regarding an individual's participation in the occupation, profession, business, or trade.

If an applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant's prior conviction was for a Class A felony, Class B felony, or Class C felony not defined under title 39, chapter 17, part 4, or if the felony conviction is for an offense for which the offender is required to register under the Tennessee Animal Abuser Registration Act, compiled in title 40, chapter 39, part 1; the Tennessee Sexual Offender and Violent Sexual Offender Registration, Verification and Tracking Act of 2004, compiled in title 40, chapter 39, part 2; or title 40, chapter 39, part 3, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the conviction relates to the fitness of the applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant engaged in the applicable occupation, profession, business, or trade.

An individual, applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant who receives written notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) may file a petition within thirty (30) business days of the receipt of the notice in Davidson County chancery court. The licensing authority must demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that the individual, applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant's conviction is related to the applicable occupation, profession, business, or trade.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a licensing authority created by this title from issuing a restricted or conditional license, if otherwise authorized to do so under law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a separate right to a contested case hearing that does not otherwise exist relative to the denial of the license, certificate, or registration under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Nothing in this section applies to:

The board of law examiners, created under § 23-1-101;

The board of judicial conduct, created under § 17-5-201;

The licensure of services and facilities operated pursuant to title 33, chapter 2, part 4, for the provision of mental health services, alcohol, and drug abuse prevention or treatment; for the provision of services for intellectual and developmental disabilities; and for personal support services;

The certification of police officers under title 38, chapter 8;

Any licensing authority created under titles 41, 48, 49, 56, and 71;

The department of financial institutions, when acting as a licensing authority pursuant to title 45;

Any license, certificate, or registration issued pursuant to the rules of the supreme court;

The licensure of pain management clinics licensed pursuant to title 63, chapter 1, part 3; and

The licensure of physicians under title 63, chapter 6 or 9.

Acts 2018, ch. 793, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 793, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Fresh Start Act.”

62-76-105. Waiver of initial licensure fees for low-income persons.

As used in this section:

“Licensing” means the procedure through which the privilege to engage in a specific profession regulated under this title is granted by a licensing authority;

“Licensing authority” means any state agency with the authority to impose training, education, or licensure fees to practice in a profession;

“Licensure fee” means a fee imposed by a licensing authority on persons licensed to practice a profession for the privilege of providing goods or services;

“Low-income persons” means persons who are enrolled in a state or federal public assistance program, including, but not limited to, temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), medicaid, or supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP); and

“State agency” means a state board, agency, or commission attached to the division of regulatory boards, as listed in § 4-3-1304(a).

Any licensing authority that requires a license for persons to practice in a profession shall waive all initial licensure fees for low-income persons.

Persons seeking a waiver of initial licensure fee requirements shall apply to the appropriate licensing authority in a format prescribed by the authority.

All licensing authorities to which this section applies shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 954, § 1.